Washington statutes.
RCW 36.53.060

Duties of licensee.

Every person obtaining a license to keep a ferry shall provide and keep in good and complete repair the necessary boat or boats for the safe conveyance of all persons and property, and furnish such boats at all times with suitable oars, setting poles, and other implements necessary for the service thereof, and shall keep a sufficient number of discreet and skillful men or women ferry workers to attend and manage the same; and he or she shall also at all times keep the place of embarking and landing in good order and repair, by cutting away the bank of the stream so that persons and property may be embarked and landed without danger or unnecessary delay.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4088; 1963 c 4 s 36.53.060. Prior: Code 1881 s 3007; 1879 p 62 s 43; 1869 p 281 s 45; 1863 p 522 s 6; 1854 p 354 s 6; RRS s 5467.]